Virginia statutes. Title 21. Drainage, Soil Conservation, Sanitation and Public Facilities Districts.
Article 6. Withdrawals From District.

§ 21-203.
Notice of intention to withdraw.

Any county or city in whole or in part embraced within a district either heretofore or hereafter created by or pursuant to any special act of the General Assembly may, by resolution adopted by its governing body and filed with the commission within six months after the creation of the district, give notice of its intention to consider withdrawing from the district. If such notice be given in the manner aforesaid then no election on the question of the issuance of bonds of the commission shall be held until at least one year after the creation of the district.

History.

1940, p. 620; 1942, p. 602; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-204.
Right to withdraw and set up separate district.

If after the giving of such notice and within one year after the creation of the district such county or city shall have taken all proceedings and performed all acts necessary for the authorization of the construction, financing and operation by or for it of a separate sewage disposal system, sufficient in the opinion of the State Health Commissioner to prevent the pollution of any of the tidal waters of the district from industrial wastes and sewage arising in or discharged from the county or city, then such county or city shall be entitled to withdraw from the district and shall thereafter cease to be a part of the district for all purposes of this chapter.

History.

1940, p. 620; 1942, p. 602; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-205.
Proof that steps for withdrawal have been taken.

The governing body of any county or city proposing to avail itself of the provisions of this article shall, within one year after the creation of the district, furnish to the commission satisfactory proof showing that it has theretofore taken all proceedings necessary and performed all acts necessary to enable it to construct, finance and operate such proposed separate sewage disposal system; in the event that the commission shall not agree with the governing body of such county or city upon the sufficiency of such proceedings and acts and proof thereof, such governing body may within thirty days petition any circuit or corporation court having jurisdiction in such county or city which shall thereupon be authorized to hear and determine whether or not such county or city has complied with the applicable provisions of §

21-204

and entitled itself to withdraw from the district.

History.

1940, p. 620; 1942, p. 602; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-206.
Power of county or city electing to set up separate district.

Any county or city which elects to construct and operate therefor a separate sewage disposal system in accordance with the provisions of §

21-204

and the governing body thereof, for the purpose of constructing, financing and operating such sewage disposal system, shall be vested with all the rights and powers and charged with all the duties otherwise vested in and imposed upon the commission with reference to such county or city, including the power to issue its bonds, construct and operate the sewage disposal system, and fix, charge and collect fees, rents and charges for the use of such sewage disposal system.

History.

1940, p. 620; 1942, p. 602; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-207.
Withdrawal must be within one year.

The transfer and vesting of rights, powers and duties shall be no longer operative if the county or city electing to withdraw shall not entitle itself to withdraw from the district within one year after the creation of the district.

History.

1940, p. 620; 1942, p. 602; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-208.
Additional rights conferred on city or county withdrawing.

The foregoing provisions of §

21-206

shall be deemed to confer additional rights and powers upon any such county or city affected, and shall in no wise deprive any such county or city of any rights and powers otherwise vested in and conferred upon such county or city by general law or charter provisions.

History.

1940, p. 620; 1942, p. 602; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-209.
No election on issuance of bonds within six months.

No election upon the question of the issuance of bonds of the commission shall be held within the first six months after the creation of the district. In the event no notice of intention to consider withdrawing from the district, in accordance with the foregoing provisions of §§

21-203

to

21-208

, is filed with the commission within six months after the creation of the district, then no county or city therein may thereafter avail itself of the provisions of such sections to withdraw from such district.

History.

1940, p. 621; 1942, p. 603; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-210.
Disposal system to be erected by separate district.

Any county or city which elects to construct and operate therein a separate sewage disposal system in accordance with the foregoing provisions of §

21-203

shall, within the period hereinafter limited for the construction of such sewage disposal system, construct and provide and have in operation in such county or city a sewage disposal system sufficient in the opinion of the State Health Commissioner to prevent the pollution of any and all tidal waters of the district, and any and all tidal waters within the county or city, from industrial wastes and sewage arising in or discharged from the county or city; and the commission is authorized and empowered to proceed by appropriate court action to require the county or city and the governing body thereof to provide therein such required sewage disposal system. From and after the expiration of such period, no such county or city nor any public body or person therein shall discharge or suffer to be discharged directly or indirectly into any tidal waters of the district, or tidal waters in such county or city, any sewage, industrial wastes or other refuse which may or will cause or contribute to pollution of any such tidal waters; this provision shall be enforceable in the manner provided for by §

21-220

. The period for the construction of such sewage disposal system, as hereinabove referred to, shall be three years from the creation of the district and such further period of time, not exceeding an additional two years, as the commission, upon application of the governing body of the county or city and after public hearing which shall be held by the commission upon such public notice as the commission may determine to be reasonable, may find to be necessary for completion of such construction by reason of causes which shall not be or have been within the control of such county or city or the governing body thereof.

History.

1940, p. 621; 1942, p. 603; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-211.
City withdrawing to provide for disposal of sewage of county or town.

If any city shall withdraw from the district pursuant to the foregoing provisions of this article, such city, if requested by the commission or the governing body of any county or town adjacent to such city, shall provide by its sewage disposal system for the treatment and disposal of sewage and industrial wastes arising in or discharged from such county or town upon such sewage and industrial wastes being delivered to such city, and shall agree with the commission or such county or town to treat and dispose of such sewage and wastes so delivered at the cost of such treatment and disposal, provided the commission or the county or town affected shall pay to the city the cost of installing any additional sewer main or mains necessitated thereby within such city. If the parties do not agree upon such costs, such costs shall be determined upon petition to the State Corporation Commission which is hereby authorized and directed to make such determination.

History.

1940, p. 621; 1942, p. 603; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-212.
Effect of nonappointment of members of commission on withdrawal.

In the event that the members of the commission shall not be appointed within two months after the creation of the district then the date of the first appointment of such members shall be deemed to be the date of the creation of such district for all the purposes of withdrawal provided by this article.

History.

1940, p. 621; 1942, p. 604; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.

§ 21-213.
Member of commission becoming nonresident because of removal or withdrawal.

If any member of a commission shall, through removal from the district or through any withdrawal or exclusion of any part or parts of any district, cease to reside within the district he shall thereupon be disqualified for holding office as a member of the commission, and the vacancy thus created shall be filled as otherwise provided.

History.

1940, p. 621; 1942, p. 604; Michie Code 1942, § 1560kk1.